Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 53

State Sharing

9-4-5301. Statutes providing base apportionment for determining additional state revenues.

Funds apportioned as state-shared taxes to county and municipal governments for any fiscal year under authority of the following statutes shall provide the base apportionment for the purpose of determining the availability of additional state revenues to meet the requirement of the Constitution of Tennessee, Article II, § 24 that the state share in the cost of any law of general application imposing increased expenditure requirements on cities and counties:

Retailers' sales tax, as authorized by title 67, chapter 6, and apportioned by § 67-6-103;

Gross receipts taxes, such portions as are authorized as payments to the state from the Tennessee Valley authority under § 13 of the act of congress creating the authority, as amended, and apportioned under §§ 67-9-101(a)(2) and 67-9-102(a);

Income tax on dividends and interest, as authorized by title 67, chapter 2, and apportioned by § 67-2-119;

Special privilege tax on beer, as authorized by title 57, chapter 5, and apportioned by § 57-5-205;

Gross receipts tax on alcoholic beverages consumed on premises, as authorized by title 57, chapter 4, and apportioned by § 57-4-306; and

Tax on sale or distribution of wine and spirits, as authorized by title 57, chapter 3, and apportioned by § 57-3-306.

Acts 1979, ch. 436, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 9-631, 9-6-301; Acts 2014, ch. 901, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Section 13 of the Tennessee Valley Authority Act 1933, referred to in this section, is codified in 16 U.S.C. § 831l.

Cross-References. State prohibited from imposing increased costs on local governments without sharing in costs, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 24.

9-4-5302. Governor's budget to show increase in apportionment — Amount of increase available to local governments.

Beginning with fiscal year 1980-1981, the budget document submitted by the governor to the general assembly shall indicate the amount of increase in the apportionment of the funds specified in § 9-4-5301 to incorporated municipalities and to county governments above apportionments for the previous year.

An amount of one million dollars ($1,000,000) of such increase shall be available for allocation to incorporated municipalities and to county governments as needed, to provide the state's share of any contribution required to fund any law of general application which requires, without local discretion, that incorporated municipalities or county governments increase expenditures as a direct consequence of the passage of any general law; provided, that when the cost of any such law is estimated to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the source and amount of funding from state funds shall be set forth in such law.

In the event the source and amount of funding from state funds is not set forth in such law, such sources and amounts shall be set forth in the general appropriations act enacted during the same session as such general law.

Acts 1979, ch. 436, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 9-632, 9-6-302.

9-4-5303. List of laws requiring increased local government expenditures — Report of allocations required to provide funding.

Prior to approval of the general appropriation act by committees on finance, ways and means of the senate and the house of representatives, the commissioner of finance and administration shall certify in writing to the chairs of those committees a listing of all laws of general application which have been adopted and signed by the governor, whose passage will require increased incorporated municipality expenditures or county government expenditures within the meaning of the fourth paragraph of the Constitution of Tennessee, Article II, § 24.

Such certification shall, to the extent possible, cite the specific costs attributed to each law by the fiscal notes prepared by the fiscal review committee, with such adjustments as are necessary to reflect the effect of any amendments or other changing circumstances.

Following receipt of such certification from the commissioner, the committees shall report in writing to the speakers of the house of representatives and the senate, with copy to the commissioner and the comptroller of the treasury, the extent of allocations from the increases in the funds identified in § 9-4-5301 required to provide the state's share of the funding of any such incorporated municipality expenditure increase or county government expenditure increase.

Any law of general application requiring increased incorporated municipality expenditures or increased county government expenditures which passes and is signed following the certification required by this section shall be identified in like manner in a supplemental certification to the committees, which shall file with the speakers, with copy to the commissioner and the comptroller of the treasury, a cumulative report indicating total assessments against such increases identified in § 9-4-5302.

Acts 1979, ch. 436, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 9-633, 9-6-303.

9-4-5304. Procedure for meeting requirement that state share increased expenditures.

For any bill requiring increased expenditures by cities and counties in an amount exceeding that level established in §9-4-5302, the general assembly shall follow the procedure established in this section in meeting the requirement that the state share in the cost of such bill:

A fiscal note prepared by the fiscal review committee shall be furnished indicating the fiscal effect of such bill and whether or not such legislation imposes an increased expenditure requirement on cities and counties;

If the legislation imposes an increased expenditure requirement on cities or counties, then such legislation shall be amended in committee to indicate the state share of such expenditure;

The sponsor of such legislation shall cause an amendment to the general appropriations act to be prepared to fund the state share and shall present such amendment to the standing committee to which such legislation is referred and to the finance, ways and means committees or on the floor of the senate or the house of representatives when the general appropriations act is being considered; and

Such amendment to the general appropriations act shall state the amount appropriated to fund the state share.

Acts 1979, ch. 436, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 9-634, 9-6-304.

Cross-References. General assembly to provide for state sharing in cost of mandated expenditures of local governments, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 24.

9-4-5305. Construction of this part.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to reduce the apportionment to local governments of the total amounts due under the statutes cited in §9-4-5301.

Acts 1979, ch. 436, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 9-635, 9-6-305.

9-4-5306. Locality does not meet municipality requirements.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,

IF, after July 1, 1998, a locality is deemed by the state to be a municipality for purposes of distributing grants or state-shared taxes; AND

IF, thereafter the locality, acting in good faith and under color of law and for municipal purposes, receives and expends or obligates grants or state-shared taxes; AND

IF, thereafter it is judicially determined that the locality was not incorporated in accordance with the requirements of law and, therefore, is not a municipality; THEN

Neither the locality nor any person who acted on behalf of the locality is required to return or repay such grants or state-shared taxes; however, subject to §67-5-104(c), any portion of such grants or state-shared taxes, that remains unexpended and unobligated, shall become assets of the county.

As used in subsection (a), “the locality, acting in good faith and under color of law and for municipal purposes, … expends” includes, but is not limited to, reimbursement paid from grants or state-shared taxes for documented, reasonable expenses of municipal incorporation that were paid out-of-pocket by one (1) or more residents acting on behalf of the locality and its incorporation.

Acts 2000, ch. 898, § 1.

Cross-References. Locality does not meet municipality requirements, §67-5-104.